test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-almos_dict-gt-nom.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - aˊlmos: # 2B
    almos+N+Sg+Nom: aˊlmos             
    almos+N+Sg+Gen: almoos
    almos+N+Sg+Acc: almoos
    almos+N+Sg+Ill: almosân
    almos+N+Sg+Loc: almosist
    almos+N+Sg+Com: almosáin
    almos+N+Sg+Abe: almoosttáá
    almos+N+Ess: aˊlmosin                
    almos+N+Par: aˊlmosid                
    almos+N+Pl+Nom: almoseh
    almos+N+Pl+Gen: almosij
    almos+N+Pl+Acc: almosijd
    almos+N+Pl+Ill: almosáid
    almos+N+Pl+Loc: almosijn
    almos+N+Pl+Com: almosijguin
    almos+N+Pl+Abe: almosijttáá
